Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-2125
Motorcycle safety courses; requirements.

(1) The department may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations establishing minimum requirements
for both basic and advanced motorcycle safety courses. The
courses shall be designed to develop, instill, and improve the knowledge and skills
necessary for safe operation of a motorcycle.

(2) The motorcycle safety courses shall be designed
to teach either a novice motorcycle rider knowledge and basic riding skills
or to refresh the knowledge and riding skills of motorcycle riders necessary
for the safe and legal operation of a motorcycle on the highways of this state.
Every motorcycle safety course shall be conducted at a site with room for
a driving course designed to allow motorcycle riders to practice the knowledge
and skills necessary for safe motorcycle operation.

Laws 1981, LB 22, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 60-2110;

Laws 1986, LB 1004, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB170, § 6.